ja: フェースパウダータイプ: 仕上げ; ルースティー; プレスト; 設定; その他
ko: 페이스 파우더 타입: 마감; 헐렁한; 눌림; 설정; 기타
vi: Loại phấn phủ: Hoàn thiện; Trà sợi rời; Ép; Cài đặt; Khác
en: Face powder type: Finishing; Loose; Pressed; Setting; Other
sk-SK: Typ púdru na tvár: Povrchová úprava; Voľný; Stlačený; Nastavovací; Iné
hu: Arcpúder típusa: Fedő; Por; Préselt; Fixáló; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta pudra za obraz: Končna obdelava; V prahu; Kompakten; Utrjevanje ličil; Drugo
th: ประเภทของแป้งทาหน้า: แป้งฟินิชชิ่ง; ชาบดเต็มใบ; แป้งอัดแข็ง; แป้งเซตผิว; อื่นๆ
fi: Kasvopuuterityyppi: Viimeistely; Irto; Painettu; Asetus; Muu
zh-CN: 扑面粉类型: 蜜粉; 松散; 粉饼; 定妆粉; 其他
it: Tipo di cipria: Finitura; Sfuso; Premuto; Impostazione; Altro
tr: Yüz Pudrası türü: Tamamlayıcı; Yaprak çay; Preslenmiş; Ayarlı; Diğer
nb: Ansiktspuddertype: Etterarbeid; Løs; Trykket; Innstilling; Annet
bg-BG: Тип пудра за лице: Завършваща; Свободна; Пресована; Фиксираща; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de pó facial: Acabamento; Granel; Compacto; Regulagem; Outro
fr: Type de poudre pour le visage: Finition; En vrac; Pressé; Paramètre; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta pudera za lice: Završni; U prahu; U kamenu; Fiksator; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip pudră de față: Finisare; Lejeră; Presată; Fixare; Altele
el: Τύπος πούδρας προσώπου: Φινίρισμα; Χύμα; Πεπιεσμένη; Στερεοποιημένη; Άλλο
de: Gesichtspudertyp: Veredelung; Lose; Gepresst; Einwirkend; Sonstiges
pl: Rodzaj pudru do twarzy: Wykończeniowy; Luźny; Prasowany; Utrwalający; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de pó facial: Acabamento; Para infusão; Pressionado; Contexto; Outro
lt-LT: Veido pudros tipas: Fiksuojamoji; Biri; Presuota; Fiksuojanti; Kita
sv: Typ av ansiktspuder: Efterbehandling; Löst; Nedtryckt; Miljö; Övrigt
nl: Type gezichtspoeder: Afwerking; Los; Gedrukt; Setting; Andere
da: Type af ansigtspudder: Finishing; Løs; Presset; Setting; Andet
ru: Тип пудры для лица: Завершение; Рассыпчатая; Прессованная; Закрепляющаяся; Другой
zh-TW: 蜜粉類型: 整理; 散裝; 已按下; 環境; 其他
cs: Typ pudru na obličej: Dokončení; Volný; Lisováno; Tvrdnoucí; Jiné
es: Tipo de polvo facial: Acabado; A granel; Compacto; Fijador; Otros